Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 7. Leasing of Mineral Land and Large-Scale Mine Legislative Approval.
Sec. 38.05.181.
Geothermal resources.

The commissioner may, under regulations adopted by the commissioner, grant prospecting permits and leases to a qualified person to explore for, develop, or use geothermal resources. When title to the surface parcel is held by a person other than the state, that person shall have a preferential right to a geothermal prospecting permit or lease for the area underlying the surface parcel. The surface owner must exercise the preference right within 30 days after receiving notice of the application for a permit, or by agreeing to meet the terms of a bid within 60 days after receiving notice of the acceptance of the bid for a lease.

The commissioner may designate a geothermal area or portion of it a competitive geothermal area. A designation as a competitive geothermal area must be on the basis of substantial geologic indications of geothermal resources or on the basis of competitive interest in geothermal resources of the area.

On state land that has not been declared a competitive geothermal area or withdrawn from geothermal prospecting, the commissioner may issue a prospecting permit to the first qualified applicant. The permit conveys an exclusive right, for a period of two years, to prospect for geothermal resources on state land included under the permit. The commissioner has discretion to renew the permit for an additional one-year term. A holder of a prospecting permit has the right, upon the showing of a discovery of geothermal resources in commercial quantities and the submission of a development plan acceptable to the commissioner, to convert the permit to a noncompetitive lease at a royalty rate under (g) of this section. The conversion privilege must be exercised not later than 30 days after the expiration of the permit. If the land included within the permit is designated a competitive geothermal area during the permit term, the permittee must apply for a noncompetitive lease within 30 days after notification of the designation or forfeit the conversion privileges and the exclusive right to prospect.

On state land that is designated a competitive geothermal area and is not subject to an existing prospecting permit, the commissioner may issue geothermal leases to the highest bidder by competitive bidding procedures established by regulations adopted by the commissioner. At the discretion of the commissioner, competitive lease sales may be by oral or sealed bid, on the basis of a cash bonus, profit share, or royalty share.

Prospecting permits and geothermal leases granted under this section must, except in the case of parcels subject to a preference right under (b) of this section, be issued for at least 40 acres but not more than 2,560 acres. A person may not own, or hold an interest in, geothermal leases covering more than 51,200 acres. However, geothermal leases in commercial production, individually or under a unit operation or well spacing or pooling arrangement, do not count against the acreage limitation. All prospecting permits and geothermal leases are subject to an annual rental, payable in advance, of $3 per acre. The rental for a year shall be credited against royalties accruing for that year.

A geothermal lease shall be issued for a primary term of 10 years and may be renewed for an additional term of five years if the lessee is actively engaged in drilling operations. A geothermal lease is valid for the duration of commercial production. Beginning 20 years after the initiation of commercial production and at 10-year intervals thereafter, the commissioner may renegotiate the rentals and royalties due on a geothermal lease.

Each geothermal lease shall be conditioned upon payment by the lessee of a royalty of 1.75 percent of the gross revenues derived from the production, sale, or use of geothermal resources under the lease during the first 10 years immediately following the date the geothermal resource first generates gross income and 3.5 percent of the gross revenues derived from the production, sale, or use of geothermal resources under the lease after that first 10-year period. Royalties may be taken in kind rather than in value if the commissioner determines that taking in kind would be in the best interest of the state.

Regulations adopted by the commissioner to implement this section shall be adopted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62).

History.

(§ 1 ch 71 SLA 1971; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am §§ 34 — 36 ch 71 SLA 1972; am §§ 40, 41 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 4 ch 175 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 38 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For geothermal resources generally, see AS 41.06.
For legislative policy with respect to geothermal resources, see § 1, ch. 175, SLA 1980 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For geothermal leasing, see 11 AAC 84, art. 7.

For geothermal unitization, see 11 AAC 84, art. 8.

For applicability, see 11 AAC 87, art. 1.

For exploratory operations, see 11 AAC 87, art. 2.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 19(a), ch. 38, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments of subsection (g) of this section apply “to a lease for a geothermal resource or the renewal of a geothermal resource entered into on or after July 1, 2010.”
Under § 19(b), ch. 38, SLA 2010, “[t]he commissioner of natural resources shall offer the royalty rates [in (g) of this section], as amended by sec. 2, ch. 38, SLA 2010, as an amendment to a lease or a renewal of a lease entered into before July 1, 2010.”

Collateral references. —

Construction and application of Geothermal Steam Act of 1970 (30 USCS § 1001 et seq.), pertaining to leases of government lands for development of geothermal steam resources, 40 ALR Fed. 814.

Sec. 38.05.182.
Royalty on natural resources.

Any royalty provided for in AS

38.05.135

—

38.05.181

may be taken in kind rather than in money if the commissioner determines that the taking in kind would be in the best interest of the state. However, royalties on oil and gas shall be taken in kind unless the commissioner determines that the taking in money would be in the best interest of the state.

The commissioner shall submit a determination to take royalty in money to the legislature at the first opportunity during a current session or, if the legislature is not in session, at the next regular session. The legislature, within 60 days or by the adjournment of the session, whichever comes sooner, may revoke the determination by concurrent resolution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1970; am § 7 ch 71 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 9 SSSLA 1974; am § 5 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 146 SLA 1977; am § 8 ch 112 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

38.05.362

. Renumbered in 1970.

Administrative Code. —

For disposition of royalty oil, gas, or gas liquids, see 11 AAC 3.

For royalty products, see 11 AAC 82, art. 7.

Sec. 38.05.183.
Sale of royalty.

The sale, exchange, or other disposal of a mineral obtained by the state as a royalty under AS

38.05.182

, the sale, exchange, or other disposal in whole or in part of a right to receive future mineral production under a state lease under this chapter, or the sale, exchange, or other disposal of gas delivered to the state under AS

43.55.014(b)

shall be by competitive bid and the sale, exchange, or other disposal made to the highest responsible bidder, except that competitive bidding is not required when the commissioner, after prior written notice to the Alaska Royalty Oil and Gas Development Advisory Board under AS

38.06.050

, determines that the best interest of the state does not require it or that no competition exists.

When competitive bids are required, the commissioner, after prior written notice to the Alaska Royalty Oil and Gas Development Advisory Board, may reject all bids on a determination that because of the amount of the bids, the lack of responsibility on the part of the bidders, or for reasons consistent with the criteria set out in AS

38.06.070

, the acceptance of the bids would not be in the best interest of the state.

If the commissioner determines that a sale, exchange, or other disposal of a mineral obtained by the state as a royalty under AS

38.05.182

, of a right to receive future mineral production under a state lease under this chapter, or of gas delivered to the state under AS

43.55.014(b)

shall be made otherwise than by competitive bid, and the Alaska Royalty Oil and Gas Development Advisory Board has been notified in writing of that determination, the commissioner shall make public in writing the specific findings and conclusions on which that determination is based.

Oil or gas taken in kind by the state as its royalty share or gas delivered to the state under AS

43.55.014(b)

may not be sold or otherwise disposed of for export from the state until the commissioner determines that the oil or gas is surplus to the present and projected intrastate domestic and industrial needs. The commissioner shall make public, in writing, the specific findings and reasons on which the determination is based.

When a sale, exchange, or other disposal of oil or gas taken in kind by the state as its royalty share, or a sale, exchange, or other disposal in whole or in part of a right to receive future royalty oil or gas, under a state lease under this chapter is made other than by competitive bid, or when a sale, exchange, or other disposal of gas delivered to the state under AS

43.55.014(b)

is made other than by competitive bid, the sale, exchange, or other disposal shall be awarded by the commissioner to the prospective buyer whose proposal offers the maximum benefits to citizens of the state. The commissioner shall consider

the cash value offered;

the projected effects of the sale, exchange, or other disposal on the economy of the state;

the projected benefits of refining or processing the oil or gas in the state;

the ability of the prospective buyer to provide refined products or by-products for distribution and sale in the state with price or supply benefits to the citizens of the state; and

the criteria listed in AS

38.06.070(a)

.

The commissioner may not enter into a contract for the sale of royalty oil unless the contract provides that any material amendment to the contract that appreciably reduces the consideration received by the state requires prior approval of the legislature.

AS

38.05.035(e)

does not apply to a sale, exchange, or other disposal of oil or gas under this section.

Upon legislative approval, the commissioner may enter into a contract to sell royalty gas taken in kind by the state to a gas or electric utility at a negotiated price for the gas if the commissioner, after considering the consumer benefits, other benefits, and detriments of the sale, makes a written finding that the sale is in the best interest of the state. In this subsection,

“gas or electric utility” has the meaning given in AS

38.05.180

(bb);

“royalty gas taken in kind by the state” does not include royalty gas taken in kind by the state from gas production on land patented to the state under

P.L. 84-830, 70 Stat. 709 (Alaska Mental Health Enabling Act);

38 Stat. 1214 (Act of March 4, 1915); or

43 U.S.C. 1635 in settlement of the claims of the state under 38 Stat. 1214.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 9 SSSLA 1974; am §§ 9, 10 ch 112 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 68 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 105 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 55 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 134 SLA 1990; am §§ 29 — 32 ch 14 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 38.05.363. Renumbered in 1970.

Cross references. —

For required legislative approval of waiver of right to receive royalty oil or gas, see AS

38.06.055

.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 14, SLA 2014, see 2014 Senate Journal 1423 — 1426.

Administrative Code. —

For disposition of royalty oil, gas, or gas liquids, see 11 AAC 3.

For royalty products, see 11 AAC 82, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, in (a), inserted “or the sale, exchange, or other disposal of gas delivered to the state under AS

43.55.014(b)

” following “state lease under this chapter,”; in (c), inserted “, or of gas delivered to the state under AS

43.55.014(b)

” following “state lease under this chapter,”; in (d), inserted “, or gas delivered to the state under AS 43.55.014(b)” following “its royalty share” and deleted “royalty-in-kind” following “commissioner determines that the”; in the introductory language in (e), inserted “or when a sale, exchange, or other disposal of gas delivered to the state under AS 43.55.014(b) is made other than by competitive bid,” following the first occurrence of “other than by competitive bid,”; made stylistic changes.

Sec. 38.05.184.
Limitation on oil and gas leases in Kachemak Bay.

The legislature finds that Kachemak Bay is an area of extraordinary abundance and diversity of marine life that has provided, and will continue to provide in the future, a basis for one of the state’s most important commercial fisheries; that recent information discloses that even minute quantities of oil released into the marine environment may be harmful to the larval forms of crabs and other marine life and that the existence of gyral currents within the bay may increase the likelihood of oil coming into contact with these valuable commercial fish and shellfish species; and that therefore oil and gas development in the bay, at this time, presents an undue hazard to this valuable state renewable resource.

No additional oil or gas leases may be issued by the department or any other state agency for the exploration for or the development or production of oil and gas on state-owned land and waters seaward of the mean higher high water line, beginning at Anchor Point; then around the perimeter of Kachemak Bay, to Point Pogibshi; then west to the three mile limit of state land and waters; then north to a point three miles west of Anchor Point; then east to the mean higher high water line of Anchor Point, the point of beginning.

[Repealed, § 61 ch 50 SLA 1989.]

[Repealed, § 61 ch 50 SLA 1989.]

[Repealed, § 61 ch 50 SLA 1989.]

[Repealed, § 61 ch 50 SLA 1989.]

[Repealed, § 61 ch 50 SLA 1989.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 1976; am § 61 ch 50 SLA 1989)